Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 4

Foster Care

37-2-401. Legislative intent — Construction of part.

The primary purpose of this part is to protect children from unnecessary separation from parents who will give them good homes and loving care, to protect them from needless prolonged placement in foster care and the uncertainty it provides, and to provide them a reasonable assurance that, if an early return to the care of their parents is not possible, they will be placed in a permanent home at an early date.

The secondary purpose of this part is to provide a mechanism to monitor the care of children in foster care to ensure that everything reasonably possible is being done to achieve a permanent plan for the child.

When a parent by such parent's actions or failure to act fails to fulfill such parent's responsibilities as a parent, the court shall consider such conduct in determining whether to terminate parental rights, regardless of whether the parent intended such parent's conduct to constitute a relinquishment or forfeiture of such parent's parental rights. When the interests of a child and those of an adult are in conflict, such conflict is to be resolved in favor of a child, and to these ends this part shall be liberally construed.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 1; 1982, ch. 811, § 1; 1983, ch. 438, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., § 37-1501(a).

Rule Reference. This part is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

This part is referred to in Rule 32 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Coppock on Tennessee Adoption Law, (1998-99 ed., Coppock).

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501.

37-2-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abandonment” for purposes of terminating the parental or guardian rights of a parent or a guardian of a child to that child in order to make that child available for adoption, has the same meaning as defined in § 36-1-102;

For purposes of this subdivision (1), “token support” means that the support, under the circumstances of the individual case, is insignificant given the parent's means;

For purposes of this subdivision (1), “token visitation” means that the visitation, under the circumstances of the individual case, constitutes nothing more than perfunctory visitation or visitation of such an infrequent nature or of such short duration as to merely establish minimal or insubstantial contact with the child;

For purposes of this subdivision (1), “willfully failed to support” or “willfully failed to make reasonable payments toward such child's support” means that, for a period of four (4) consecutive months, no monetary support was paid or that the amount of support paid is token support;

For purposes of this subdivision (1), “willfully failed to visit” means the willful failure, for a period of four (4) consecutive months, to visit or engage in more than token visitation;

Abandonment may not be repented of by resuming visitation or support subsequent to the filing of any petition seeking to terminate parental or guardianship rights or seeking the adoption of a child; and

“Abandonment” and “abandonment of infant” do not have any other definition except that which is set forth herein, it being the intent of the general assembly to establish the only grounds for abandonment by statutory definition. Specifically, it shall not be required that a parent be shown to have evinced a settled purpose to forego all parental rights and responsibilities in order for a determination of abandonment to be made. Decisions of any court to the contrary are hereby legislatively overruled;

“Abandonment of an infant” means, for purposes of terminating parental or guardian rights, “abandonment” of a child under one (1) year of age;

“Agency” means a child care agency, as defined in title 71, chapter 3, part 5, or in chapter 5, part 5 of this title, regardless of whether such agency is licensed or approved, and includes the department of children's services;

“Board” means an advisory review board appointed by a juvenile court judge, juvenile court judges, or the department of children's services as provided in this part;

“Court” means the juvenile court having jurisdiction over the person of the child, or, if no juvenile court has jurisdiction over the child, then the juvenile court in the county in which the child resides;

“Date of foster care placement” means the original date on which the child is physically placed in foster care;

“Judge” means a juvenile judge or the judge having jurisdiction over the person of the child;

“Parent” means the natural parent or legal guardian, except in cases when guardianship is held by an agency pursuant to a determination of abandonment or surrender of parental rights;

“Plan” or “permanency plan” means a written plan for a child placed in foster care with the department of children's services or in the care of an agency as defined in subdivision (3) and as provided in § 37-2-403; and

“Report” means a written report by an advisory review board as provided in § 37-2-406 or by the department of children's services or by an agency having custody of a child as provided in § 37-2-404.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 1; 1982, ch. 811, § 1; 1983, ch. 438, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., § 37-1501(b); Acts 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 112; 1997, ch. 253, § 1; 1998, ch. 1097, §§ 13, 14; 2000, ch. 981, §§ 51, 57; 2001, ch. 388, § 5; 2009, ch. 411, § 9; 2010, ch. 842, § 3; 2010, ch. 887, § 1; 2020, ch. 525, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 411, § 12 provided that the act, which amended §§36-1-102,36-1-108,37-1-102,37-2-402 and added new §37-1-183, shall apply to conduct covered by the provisions of the act that occurs on or after July 1, 2009. The eighteen (18) month time period set out in §37-1-102(b)(12)(J) shall not commence until July 1, 2009.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the definition of “abandonment” which read: “‘Abandonment’ means, for purposes of terminating the parental or guardian rights of a parent or parents or a guardian or guardians of a child to that child in order to make that child available for adoption, that: “(i) For a period of four (4) consecutive months immediately preceding the filing of a proceeding or pleading to terminate the parental rights of the parent or parents or a guardian or guardians of the child who is the subject of the petition for termination of parental rights or adoption, that the parent or parents or a guardian or guardians either have willfully failed to visit or have willfully failed to support or make reasonable payments toward the support of the child;“(ii) The child has been removed from the home of the parent or parents or a guardian or guardians as the result of a petition filed in the juvenile court in which the child was found to be a dependent and neglected child, as defined in §37-1-102, and the child was placed in the custody of the department or a licensed child-placing agency, that the juvenile court found, or the court where the termination of parental rights petition is filed found, that the department or a licensed child-placing agency made reasonable efforts to prevent removal of the child or that the circumstances of the child's situation prevented reasonable efforts from being made prior to the child's removal; and for a period of four (4) months following the removal, the department or agency has made reasonable efforts to assist the parent or parents or a guardian or guardians to establish a suitable home for the child, but that the parent or parents or a guardian or guardians have made no reasonable efforts to provide a suitable home and have demonstrated a lack of concern for the child to such a degree that it appears unlikely that they will be able to provide a suitable home for the child at an early date. The efforts of the department or agency to assist a parent or guardian in establishing a suitable home for the child may be found to be reasonable if such efforts exceed the efforts of the parent or guardian toward the same goal, when the parent or guardian is aware that the child is in the custody of the department;“(iii) A biological or legal father has either willfully failed to visit or willfully failed to make reasonable payments toward the support of the child's mother during the four (4) months immediately preceding the birth of the child; provided, that in no instance shall a final order terminating the parental rights of a parent as determined pursuant to this subdivision (1)(A)(iii) be entered until at least thirty (30) days have elapsed since the date of the child's birth;“(iv) A parent or guardian is incarcerated at the time of the institution of an action or proceeding to declare a child to be an abandoned child, or the parent or guardian has been incarcerated during all or part of the four (4) months immediately preceding the institution of such action or proceeding, and either has willfully failed to visit or has willfully failed to support or make reasonable payments toward the support of the child for four (4) consecutive months immediately preceding such parent's or guardian's incarceration, or the parent or guardian has engaged in conduct prior to incarceration that exhibits a wanton disregard for the welfare of the child; or“(v) The child, as a newborn infant aged seventy-two (72) hours or less, was voluntarily left at a facility by such infant's mother pursuant to §68-11-255, and, for a period of thirty (30) days after the date of voluntary delivery, the mother failed to visit or seek contact with the infant; and, for a period of thirty (30) days after notice was given under §36-1-142(e), and no less than ninety (90) days cumulatively, the mother failed to seek contact with the infant through the department or to revoke her voluntary delivery of the infant;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 525, § 13. March 6, 2020.

Cross-References. Foster parent as “state employee” for purposes of defense counsel commission statute, §8-42-101.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451 (1978).

Storied Anna Mae He Decision Clarifies Law But Leaves Unanswered Questions (Christina A. Zawisza), 38 U. Mem. L. Rev. 637 (2008).

37-2-403. Contents of permanency plan — Statement of responsibilities — Collection of information on biological parents.

Within thirty (30) days of the date of foster care placement, an agency shall prepare a plan for each child in its foster care. Such plan shall include a goal for each child of:

Return of the child to parent;

Permanent placement of the child with a fit and willing relative or relatives of the child;

Adoption, giving appropriate consideration to § 36-1-115(g) when applicable;

Permanent guardianship; or

A planned permanent living arrangement.

Such plans are subject to modification and shall be reevaluated and updated at least annually, except when a long-term agreement has been made in accordance with this part.

The permanency plan for any child in foster care shall include a statement of responsibilities between the parents, the agency and the caseworker of such agency. Such statements shall include the responsibilities of each party in specific terms and shall be reasonably related to the achievement of the goal specified in subdivision (a)(1). The statement shall include the definitions of “abandonment” and “abandonment of an infant” contained in § 36-1-102 and the criteria and procedures for termination of parental rights. Each party shall sign the statement and be given a copy of it. The court must review the proposed plan, make any necessary modifications and ratify or approve the plan within sixty (60) days of the foster care placement. The department of children's services shall, by rules promulgated pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 2, determine the required elements or contents of the permanency plan.

The parents or legal guardians of the child shall receive notice to appear at the court review of the permanency plan and the court shall explain on the record the law relating to abandonment contained in § 36-1-102, and shall explain that the consequences of failure to visit or support the child will be termination of the parents' or guardians' rights to the child, and the court will further explain that the parents or guardians may seek an attorney to represent the parents or guardians in any termination proceeding. If the parents or legal guardians are not at the hearing to review the permanency plan, the court shall explain to the parents or guardians at any subsequent hearing regarding the child held thereafter, that the consequences of failure to visit or support the child will be termination of the parents' or guardians' rights to the child and that they may seek an attorney to represent the parents or guardians in a termination proceeding.

If the parents or guardians of the child cannot be given notice to appear at the court review of the permanency plan, or if they refuse or fail to appear at the court review of the permanency plan, or cannot be found to provide notice for the court review of the permanency plan, any agency that holds custody of the child in foster care or in any other type of care and that seeks to terminate parental or guardian rights based upon abandonment of that child under § 36-1-102, shall not be precluded from proceeding with the termination based upon the grounds of abandonment, if the agency demonstrates at the time of the termination proceeding:

That the court record shows, or the petitioning party presents to the court a copy of the permanency plan that shows that the defendant parents or legal guardians, subsequent to the court review in subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i), has signed the portion of the permanency plan that describes the criteria for establishing abandonment under § 36-1-102, or that the court record shows that, at a subsequent hearing regarding the child, the court made the statements to the parents or legal guardians required by subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i);

By an affidavit, that the child's permanency plan containing language that describes the criteria for establishing abandonment under § 36-1-102 was presented by the agency party to the parents or guardians at any time prior to filing the termination petition, or that there was an attempt at any time to present the plan that describes the criteria for establishing abandonment under § 36-1-102 to the parents or guardians at any time by the agency party, and that such attempt was refused by the parents or guardians; and

That, if the court record does not contain a signed copy of the permanency plan, or if the petitioning agency cannot present evidence of a permanency plan showing evidence of such notice having been given or an affidavit showing that the plan was given or that the plan was attempted to be given to the parents or guardians by the agency and was refused by the parents or guardians, and, in this circumstance, if there is no other court record of the explanation by the court of the consequences of abandonment and the right to seek an attorney at any time, then the petitioning agency shall file with the court an affidavit in the termination proceeding that describes in detail the party's diligent efforts to bring such notice required by subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) to such parent or guardian at any time prior to filing the agency's filing of the termination petition.

Substantial noncompliance by the parent with the statement of responsibilities provides grounds for the termination of parental rights, notwithstanding other statutory provisions for termination of parental rights, and notwithstanding the failure of the parent to sign or to agree to such statement if the court finds the parent was informed of its contents, and that the requirements of the statement are reasonable and are related to remedying the conditions that necessitate foster care placement. The permanency plan shall not require the parent to obtain employment if such parent has sufficient resources from other means to care for the child, and shall not require the parent to provide the child with the child's own bedroom unless specific safety or medical reasons exist that would make bedroom placement of the child with another child unsafe.

At any hearing in which a court orders a child to be placed in foster care, the judge shall determine whether a permanency plan has been prepared and whether the statement of responsibilities has been agreed upon by the parties. If a statement has been agreed upon by the parties, the court shall review it and approve it if the court finds it to be in the best interest of the child. If a plan had not been prepared or parties have not agreed to a statement of responsibilities, the court may continue the hearing for such time, not to exceed thirty (30) days, as may be necessary to give the parties an opportunity to attempt to agree on a suitable plan, which may then be approved by the court without a further hearing if the court finds the plan to be in the best interest of the child, but no longer than sixty (60) days after the foster care placement, except as provided in § 37-1-166.

If the parties are unable to agree on a statement of responsibilities during this period of time, the court shall hold a further informal hearing to decide on a statement of responsibilities. At such hearing, all relevant evidence, including oral and written reports, may be received by the court and relied upon to the extent of its probative value. The parties or their counsel shall be afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert written reports so received and to cross-examine individuals making the reports.

In determining the terms of the statement, the court shall, insofar as possible, in accordance with the best interest of the child, seek to:

Return the child to the parent;

Permanently place the child with a fit and willing relative or relatives of the child;

Pursue adoptive placement;

Pursue permanent guardianship; or

Provide a planned permanent living arrangement for the child.

The court shall take such action as may be necessary to develop and approve a plan that it finds to be in the best interest of the child. The plan shall be approved within sixty (60) days of the foster care placement, except as provided in § 37-1-166.

In cases involving child abuse or child neglect, with such child being placed in foster care, the statement of responsibilities shall stipulate that the abusing or neglecting parent shall receive appropriate rehabilitative assistance through mental health consultation if so ordered by the court.

The plan for a child who remains in foster care for one (1) year may be modified to a long-term agreement between a foster parent and the agency charged with the caring and custody of the child. Such agreements with foster parents shall include:

Appropriate arrangements for the child; and

Procedures for the termination of the agreement by either party when in the best interests of the child. When the department of children's services is a party to the agreement, such agreement must include provisions permitting variation in monetary allowances from fiscal year to fiscal year depending upon appropriations by the general assembly.

In lieu of the provisions of subsection (a), in the event a child is in foster care as a result of a surrender or termination of parental rights, the agency having guardianship of the child shall prepare and submit to the foster care advisory review board or court in the county in which the child is in foster care a plan for each such child.

Such plan shall include a goal for each child of:

Permanent placement of the child with a fit and willing relative or relatives of the child;

Adoption, giving appropriate consideration to § 36-1-115(g) when applicable;

Permanent guardianship; or

A planned permanent living arrangement.

Specific reasons must be included in the plan for any goal other than placement of the child with a relative of the child or adoption. Such plan shall also include a statement of specific responsibilities of the agency and the caseworker of such agency designed to achieve the stated goal.

The statement of responsibilities on a permanency plan that is ordered by the court shall empower the state agency to select any specific residential or treatment placement or programs for the child according to the determination made by that state agency, its employees, agents or contractors.

Whenever a child is removed from such child's home and placed in the department's custody, the department shall seek to place the child with a fit and willing relative if such placement provides for the safety and is in the best interest of the child. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other law to the contrary, whenever return of a child to such child's parent is determined not to be in the best interest of the child, then such relative with whom the child has been placed shall be given priority for permanent placement or adoption of the child prior to pursuing adoptive placement of such child with a non-relative.

In addition to completing the permanency plan, within thirty (30) days of the date of foster care placement, the placement agency shall collect as much information as possible in order to complete a medical and social history on the child and the child's biological family on the form promulgated by the department pursuant to § 36-1-111(k).

Within twelve (12) months of a child entering state custody, the department shall review the child's case to determine, in the department's discretion, if reunification with family is feasible, and if not, whether to pursue termination of parental rights.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 2; 1978, ch. 804, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 272, § 1; 1982, ch. 811, § 2; 1983, ch. 438, §§ 7-12; T.C.A., § 37-1502; Acts 1988, ch. 560, §§ 1-6; 1995, ch. 532, § 15; 1996, ch. 1054, §§ 102, 125; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 111, 113; 1998, ch. 1097, §§ 15-17, 30; 2002, ch. 629, §§ 1-4; 2007, ch. 372, §§ 7-9; 2010, ch. 842, § 4; 2010, ch. 881, § 1; 2013, ch. 354, § 2; 2019, ch. 510, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 510, § 7. June 3, 2019.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451 (1978).

Storied Anna Mae He Decision Clarifies Law But Leaves Unanswered Questions (Christina A. Zawisza), 38 U. Mem. L. Rev. 637 (2008).

37-2-404. Progress report to court or review board — Review of permanency plan.

In addition to the plan required in § 37-2-403, the department or agency shall submit to the appropriate court or foster care review board a report for each child in its foster care on progress made in achieving the goals set out in the plan. Such reports shall be prepared by the department or agency having custody of the child within ninety (90) days of the date of foster care placement and no less frequently than every six (6) months thereafter for so long as the child remains in foster care. At the time the progress report is provided to the court or foster care review board, the department or agency shall also provide a copy of the report to the child's parent(s) whose rights have not been terminated or surrendered, the parent's attorney, the guardian ad litem and/or attorney for the child, and the child who is a party to the proceeding.

Within ninety (90) days of the date of foster care placement and no less often than every six (6) months thereafter for so long as the child remains in foster care, the court or foster care review board shall review the plan for each child in foster care. Notice of this review and the right to attend and participate in the review shall be provided to the child's parent(s) whose rights have not been terminated or surrendered, the parent's attorney, the guardian ad litem and/or attorney for the child, foster parents, prospective adoptive parent, relative providing care for the child and the child who is a party to the proceeding. The department and the court shall develop adequate procedures to provide notice of the review to the aforementioned persons. The court or board shall review the safety, permanency and wellbeing of the child by assessing the necessity and appropriateness of continued foster care placement, the appropriateness of services for the child, the compliance of all parties to the statement of responsibilities, the extent of progress in alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care and in achieving the goals contained in the permanency plan, and project a likely date on which the goal of the plan will be achieved.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 3; 1978, ch. 804, § 3; 1979, ch. 272, § 2; 1982, ch. 811, § 3; 1983, ch. 438, § 13; T.C.A., § 37-1503; Acts 1988, ch. 560, §§ 7, 8; 1996, ch. 1079, § 111; 1998, ch. 1097, § 18; 2010, ch. 842, § 5.

37-2-405. Adoption of guidelines.

The department of children's services may, by regulation, adopt and prepare additional guidelines for the plans required of agencies; however, no such guidelines shall apply to a licensed child care agency if not applicable to the department. All plans established for the child shall contain at least the following:

The purpose for which the child has been placed in foster care;

The estimated length of time in which the purpose of foster care will be accomplished;

The description of services that are to be provided in order for the purpose of foster care to be accomplished, including those services to be provided to the family; and

The person within the department or agency who is directly responsible for assuring that the plan is implemented.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 3; 1979, ch. 272, § 3; 1983, ch. 438, § 19; T.C.A., § 37-1504; Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 4; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 2000, ch. 981, § 51; 2010, ch. 842, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Article II, § 24 of the Constitution of Tennessee provides, in part, that: “Any law requiring the expenditure of state funds shall be null and void unless, during the session in which the act receives final passage, an appropriation is made for the estimated first year's funding.”

The Tennessee code commission has been advised by the commissioner of finance and administration that the necessary first year's funding was not appropriated during the 1991 regular session for the public act that would have amended this section.

The code commission was directed by Acts 1991, ch. 509, § 54 to not codify acts that did not receive first year's funding. Accordingly, Acts 1991, ch. 246, § 3, which would have amended this section, has not been codified. If ch. 246, § 3 had been codified, the amendment of (b) by that act would have read as follows: “(b) The Tennessee commission on children and youth shall develop and provide such training to juvenile court judges, youth services officers, review board members, and departmental staff as may be necessary to provide such persons with adequate knowledge to perform their duties under this part.”

Cross-References. Commission on children and youth, title 37, ch. 3, part 1.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451 (1978).

37-2-406. Foster care review boards — Request by judges for recommendations in making appointments — Composition — Option for judges to review cases.

One (1) or more foster care review boards are hereby established in each county or in a region comprised of contiguous counties, the members being appointed by the judge or judges having juvenile court jurisdiction in such county or region by their mutual agreement. The judge or judges may appoint more than one (1) board and divide the workload in an equitable manner.

The judge or judges may request recommendations from the administrative office of the courts or the department of children's services in making appointments to the foster care review board. Each board may include a nurse, a doctor, a lawyer, a member of a human resource agency, such as the departments of health or human services, a member of a local education agency, a staff member of a local mental health agency, a youth who was formerly in foster care and shall include a mother or father with a minor child and a person under the age of thirty (30). The members appointed to the board shall serve for two (2) years and shall serve without any form of compensation or reimbursement of expenses. The youth services officer or other designated officer of the court shall serve as a facilitator to each county or regional board. In counties with a population of less than one hundred thousand (100,000), the board shall consist of five (5) members. In counties with a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000), and in regions, each board shall consist of seven (7) members. A quorum must exist to conduct the review.

In lieu of the provisions of subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), the judge having juvenile court jurisdiction in any county may elect to personally review each case and, therefore, not appoint a foster care review board or to personally review certain cases instead of assigning them to the board for review even though a board is appointed. In the event the judge elects not to appoint a board, the judge shall specify by written order of the court duly entered on the record the guidelines and procedures the judge will use to ensure that the judge conducts the reviews required by this part for every child in foster care under the jurisdiction of the judge's court within ninety (90) days of the child's date of foster care and no less frequently than every six (6) months thereafter until such time as the child is no longer in foster care. A copy of this order shall be furnished to the county director of the department and to the commission on children and youth. The court may elect at any time to rescind this order and appoint a board pursuant to subdivisions (a)(1) and (2).

All board members shall be required to participate in the training related to the performance of their duties.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the court from reviewing a case, in lieu of the foster care review board, on either a motion by any party or on the court's own motion.

It is the responsibility of the foster care review board or court to conduct the reviews specified in subsection (a). The board and the department shall develop adequate procedures to ensure that the case of each child in foster care is reviewed no less frequently than ninety (90) days after placement in foster care and every six (6) months thereafter; provided, that whenever a judicial hearing that addresses the issues specified in § 37-2-404 is held within six (6) months of a review, the next review may be held within six (6) months of the judicial hearing instead of within six (6) months of the previous review, except for the first hearing held within ninety (90) days of the foster care placement.

The foster care review board shall submit a report to the judge on each child reviewed. Such report shall be submitted to the judge within ten (10) calendar days following the review conducted by the board. Such reports are advisory and shall contain the board's findings and recommendations pursuant to the provisions of § 37-2-404(b). The report shall include the date of the next review. A copy of the report shall be provided to the department or agency and to the child's parent(s) whose rights have not been terminated or surrendered, the parent's attorney, the guardian ad litem and/or attorney for the child, and the child who is a party to the proceeding.

The foster care review board may also make a direct referral to the judge or magistrate with such findings and recommendations under the following circumstances and timeframes:

Where conditions persist that constitute a deterrent to reaching the permanency goals in a given case and such conditions indirectly and chronically compromise the health, safety or welfare of the child, such direct referral case shall be heard by the judge or magistrate within thirty (30) calendar days; or

Where issues in a particular case constitute a risk of harm and directly compromise the health, safety or welfare of the child, such direct referral case shall be heard by the judge or magistrate within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding non-judicial days.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 4; 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1979, ch. 272, § 4; 1982, ch. 811, § 4; 1983, ch. 438, §§ 14-16; T.C.A., § 37-1505; Acts 1984, ch. 789, § 4; 1988, ch. 560, §§ 9, 10; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 111; 1999, ch. 164, § 1; 2009, ch. 235, § 1; 2010, ch. 842, §§ 7-10.

Code Commission Notes.

Article II, § 24 of the Constitution of Tennessee provides, in part, that: “Any law requiring the expenditure of state funds shall be null and void unless, during the session in which the act receives final passage, an appropriation is made for the estimated first year's funding.”

The Tennessee code commission has been advised by the commissioner of finance and administration that the necessary first year's funding was not appropriated during the 1991 regular session for the public act that would have amended this section.

The code commission was directed by Acts 1991, ch. 509, § 54 to not codify acts that did not receive first year's funding. Accordingly, Acts 1991, ch. 246, §§ 1 and 4, which would have amended this section, have not been codified. If ch. 246, §§ 1 and 4 had been codified, the amendments of this section by that act, rewriting (c)(1) and adding (d), would have read as follows: “(c)(1) The board shall submit a report to the judge on each child in foster care. Such report shall be submitted to the judge within thirty (30) days following the review conducted by the board and shall contain the board's findings and recommendations regarding the efforts and progress made by the department or agency to carry out the foster care plan, together with any other recommendations it chooses to make regarding the child. The findings and recommendations shall include the date of the next review. A copy of such findings and recommendations shall be sent to the department or agency and to the parent(s). Such assessments and reports are advisory. If the department or agency does not follow the board's recommendations, the department or agency shall timely inform the board of the reasons for not following the recommendations.

“(d) On or before October 1, each review board on foster care shall file an annual report which contains the following information for the preceding fiscal year:

“(1) The number of cases reviewed by the board;

“(2) The total number of children involved in such cases;

“(3) The number of cases in which the board recommended each of the following:

“(A) Return of the child to the child's home;

“(B) Termination of parental rights; and

“(C) Continuation of the child's foster care placement;

“(4) The total number of children for whom the board recommended each of the following:

“(A) Return of the child to the child's home;

“(B) Termination of parental rights; and

“(C) Continuation of the child's foster care placement;

“(5) The number of children who were actually returned home;

“(6) The number of children who were actually placed for adoption;

“(7) The number of children who were freed for adoption by termination of parental rights; and

“(8) The number of children who continued in foster care.

“Each board shall file its annual report with the commissioner of human services, the executive director of the commission on children and youth, and the executive director of the general assembly's select committee on children and youth.”

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Commission on children and youth, title 37, ch. 3, part 1.

Youth services officer, §37-1-106.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77 (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451, 493 (1978).

37-2-407. Department of children's services — Duties.

The department of children's services shall prepare suggestions for review procedures that may be used by each advisory review board. Such suggested procedures may provide a basis for uniform review procedure throughout this state.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 5; T.C.A., § 37-1506; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 73.

37-2-408. Confidentiality of plans and records.

All records, reports, permanency plans, reviews and reports of the foster care review boards or any material prepared in connection with the planning, placement or care of a child in the care or custody of the department of children's services or in foster care with any agency or person pursuant to this part, shall be confidential and shall not be a public record and shall be disclosed only for the purposes directly related to the administration of this part, or as permitted pursuant to the provisions of § 37-1-409 or § 37-1-612, or as otherwise determined by the department of children's services to be reasonably necessary or reasonably required and as directly related to the provision of any services needed by the child.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 6; T.C.A., § 37-1507; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 114.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of personal information and records, §37-2-411.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451 (1978).